Utah statutes.
31A-13-106.   Annual accounting by insurance companies, service plans, and corporate trustees and agents.

Any insurance company, hospital, surgical or medical service plan providing benefits under an employee welfare fund, and any corporate trustee or agent holding or administering all or any part of an employee welfare fund shall, within four months after the end of each policy or of the fiscal year, furnish to the trustees of the fund a statement of account giving any information that the trustees of the fund need to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

